Massachusetts, session 194th, S732.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176Q of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4 the
following section:-
Section 4A. (a) There shall be a commonwealth dental access program to be administered
by the board, which shall provide access to stand-alone dental insurance plans to individuals who
reside in the commonwealth and do not meet the definition of a qualified individual under 42
U.S.C. section 18032(f). The program shall operate independently from the connector
established under this chapter.
(b) Information provided by or relating to an insured under this section shall not be
considered a public record under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 or chapter 66 and
shall not be disclosed by the connector, except as required by federal law or as authorized by
regulations promulgated by the attorney general.
(c) The connector shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
of 1